Colorado, session 2026A, SB026.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-236, amend
(1)(a.8) as follows:
42-4-236. Child restraint systems required - exemptions -
penalty - definitions.
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a.8) "Motor vehicle" means a passenger car; a pickup truck; or a
van, minivan, or sport utility vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

less than ten SIXTEEN thousand pounds. "Motor vehicle" does not include
motorcycles, low-power scooters, and farm tractors and implements of
husbandry designed primarily or exclusively for use in agricultural
operations.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3)
of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or
part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-026

(2) This act applies to infractions committed on or after the
applicable effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-026